Massachusetts, session 194th, HD6262.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 268 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 official edition,
is hereby amended by striking out Section 28 in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
“Section 28. (a) Whoever gives or delivers to a prisoner in any correctional institution, or
in any jail or house of correction, any drug or article whatever, or has in his possession within the
precincts of any prison herein named with intent to give or deliver to any prisoner any such drug
or article without the permission of the superintendent or keeper, shall be punished by
imprisonment in the state prison for not more than five years, or in a jail or house of correction
for not more than two years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars.
(b) Whoever violates the provisions of this section while either employed by or
volunteering for a county Sheriff’s office, or the Department of Correction, or a private company
contracted by either a Sheriff’s Office or the Department of Correction to provide goods or
of 2

services to inmates, shall be punished by imprisonment in a state prison for not less than one year
nor more than five years, or for not less than one year in a house of correction. The sentence
imposed on such person shall not be reduced to less than one year, nor suspended, nor shall any
person convicted under this section be eligible for probation, parole, work release, or furlough or
receive any deduction from their sentence for good conduct prior to serving one year of the
sentence.”
of 2